Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Annual Salary Increments

18A.355.
Formula for increasing base salary or wages of state employees — Percentage of annual increment may be reduced.

An annual increment of not less than five percent (5%) of the base salary or wages of each state employee shall be granted to each employee on his anniversary date. The employee’s base salary or wages shall be increased by the amount of the annual increment. When any increment due to a promotion, reallocation, reclassification or salary adjustment is granted an employee, the employee’s base salary or wages shall be increased by the amount of such increment. An employee’s base salary or wages shall not be increased by the amount of lump-sum payment awarded under KRS 18A.110(7)(j).

The branch budget recommendation submitted to the General Assembly under KRS Chapter 48 shall include a request for the amount of the annual increment expressed as a percentage of each employee’s base salary or wages and a request for the total appropriation needed to fund the annual increment. The annual increment shall be uniform for all employees. The financial plan enacted under the provisions of KRS

48.300

shall contain the annual increment expressed as a percentage of each employee’s base salary or wages, and the total appropriation needed to fund the annual increment.

The budget reduction plan submitted and enacted under the provisions of KRS Chapter 48 shall provide that a reduction of the annual increment granted under this section shall be made only after other cost savings measures, as provided by KRS

18A.1132

, are taken. Any such reduction shall be uniform for all state employees and shall comply with the provisions of this chapter and KRS Chapter 48.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 456, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 111, § 168, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 494, § 22, effective July 15, 1986; 2000, ch. 501, § 3, effective July 14, 2000.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(10/19/2004). 2004 (1st Extra. Sess.) Ky. Acts ch. 1, sec 10, provides, “Notwithstanding KRS 18A.355(1):

“(1)
A cost-of-living adjustment of two percent is provided in fiscal year 2004-2005 on the base salary or wages of each eligible state employee on his or her anniversary date and shall apply retroactively to July 1, 2004; and

“(2)
Effective January 1, 2005, an additional cost-of-living adjustment of one percent is provided on the base salary or wages of each eligible state employee.”

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. IV, 2 at 1755.

18A.360.
Increase or reduction of annual increment. [Repealed.]